Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2901
Legislative intent.

The Legislature finds that it is in the public interest to encourage maintenance of community buildings and grounds for the housing of various community enterprises and activities and for social, athletic, and recreational purposes and that different methods of accomplishing this should be made available in order to meet the desires and needs of different areas of the state.

Laws 1977, LB 29, § 1.